Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1132.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of health services; Arizona state hospital; additional facilities The sum of $______ is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of health services for construction of a new wing for additional facilities at the Arizona state hospital established pursuant to section 36-202, Arizona Revised Statutes.